Nebraska, session 109, LB1210.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1210 LB1210
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 84-612, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
84-612 (1) There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund
known as the Cash Reserve Fund which shall be under the direction of the
State Treasurer. The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer funds from the Cash Reserve
Fund to the General Fund upon certification by the Director of
Administrative Services that the current cash balance in the General Fund
is inadequate to meet current obligations. Such certification shall
include the dollar amount to be transferred. Any transfers made pursuant
to this subsection shall be reversed upon notification by the Director of
Administrative Services that sufficient funds are available.
(3) In addition to receiving transfers from other funds, the Cash
Reserve Fund shall receive federal funds received by the State of
Nebraska for undesignated general government purposes, federal revenue
sharing, or general fiscal relief of the state.
(4) No funds shall be transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to
fulfill the obligations created under the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive
Act unless the balance in the Cash Reserve Fund after such transfer will
be at least equal to five hundred million dollars.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the School Safety and Security Fund as soon as
administratively possible after September 2, 2023, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(5) (6) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million four hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund on or after July 1,
2024, but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
-2-

LB1210 LB1210
2026 2026
(6) (7) The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but
before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(7) (8) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-nine million four
hundred fifty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars from the Cash Reserve
Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after July 1, 2024,
but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(8) (9) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million five
hundred thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but on or before June
30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(9) (10) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million two
hundred fifty thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the State
Insurance Fund as soon as possible after April 2, 2024, on such dates and
in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(10) (11) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund
on or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(11) (12) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars
from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or
after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
-3-

LB1210 LB1210
2026 2026
the Department of Administrative Services.
(12) (13) The State Treasurer shall transfer forty-five million
eight hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to
the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or before June 30, 2026, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(13) (14) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred thousand
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Self-Insured Liability Fund on
or before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(14) (15) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer two
hundred million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the
Transformational Project Fund in increments necessary to fund the
distributions authorized in section 81-12,193, beginning in fiscal year
2027-28 and continuing each fiscal year until such distribution
requirements are met.
(15) (16) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred forty-seven
million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or
after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(16) (17) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars
from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2026,
but before June 30, 2027, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
Sec. 2. Original section 84-612, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-4-